Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1612
Reservoir estates owned by nonconsenting owners; included when.

If a storage operator does not obtain the consent of all persons who own a reservoir estate within the storage reservoir, the commission may require that any reservoir estates owned by nonconsenting owners be included in a storage facility and subject to geologic storage.

Laws 2021, LB650, § 12.
August 28, 2021